Utah statutes.
62A-4a-202.5.   Law enforcement investigation of alleged abuse in foster
care.
Investigations of any report or allegation of abuse or neglect of a child that
allegedly occurs while the child is living in substitute care in the
protective custody, temporary custody, or custody of the division shall be
conducted by:
(1)  a law enforcement officer, as defined in Section 53-13-103; or
(2)  a child protective services investigator under Section 62A-4a-202.6.
